Utah statutes.
58-76-304.   Exemption from licensure.

In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following may engage in the practice of geology, subject to the stated circumstances and limitations, without being licensed under this chapter if they do not use the title of professional geologist or are not directly represented or held out to the public to be legally qualified to engage in the practice of geology before the public in this state:

(1)  an employee or subordinate of a professional geologist licensed under this chapter, or any employee of an individual exempted from licensure under this Subsection (1) or Subsection (2), provided that the employee's or subordinate's practice does not include responsible charge;

(2)  qualified engineers and land surveyors, licensed under Title 58, Chapter 22, Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors Licensing Act, who do not intentionally represent themselves to be professional geologists;

(3)  an individual, individual practitioner, or regular full-time employee of a firm, partnership, association, corporation, or other business entity engaged in the exploration for and development of coal, uranium, oil, natural gas, geothermal or other energy resources, precious and nonprecious metals and minerals, and industrial and other minerals, including sand, gravel, and aggregate if the geological work is performed solely for internal use within the company and is not offered directly to the public;

(4)  an individual engaged in teaching or research in the physical or natural sciences who is not otherwise engaged in practicing geology before the public;

(5)  an individual providing agricultural or agronomic soils analyses, sampling, or laboratory testing; and

(6)  an employee of a communications, utility, railroad, mining, petroleum, or manufacturing company, or an affiliate of such a company, if the geological work is performed solely for internal use within the company and is not offered directly to the public.



Enacted by Chapter 218, 2002 General Session

